Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-4,178
Licenses; cancel, suspend, or revoke; procedure; appeal.

The director may cancel, suspend, revoke, or refuse to issue or renew a school or instructor's license in any case when he or she finds the licensee or applicant has not complied with or has violated any of the provisions of sections 60-4,173 to 60-4,179 or any rule or regulation adopted and promulgated by the director under such sections. A suspended or revoked license shall be returned to the director by the licensee, and its holder shall not be eligible to apply for a license under such sections until twelve months have elapsed since the date of such suspension or revocation. Any action taken by the director to cancel, suspend, revoke, or refuse to issue or renew a license shall comply with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1967, c. 380, § 6, p. 1193;

Laws 1988, LB 352, § 104;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 60-409.11;

Laws 1989, LB 285, § 128;

Laws 1999, LB 704, § 40.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.